Arkansas, session 2025, HB1724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-608 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-608. Length of directors' terms.
(a) All members of a school district board of directors shall be
elected to a term of office of not less than three (3) years nor more than
five (5) years four (4) years or six (6) years in length and with the
expiration of such terms so arranged that, as nearly as possible, an equal
number of positions are filled each year every school board election.
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, members of a school district
board of directors shall have terms of office of equal length.
(c)(1) A member of a school district board of directors shall not
serve more than one (1) full term as a holdover.
*SSS099*
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
(2) If at the expiration of the holdover term a person is not
elected to fill the position at the annual school board election or the
person elected fails to subscribe to the director's oath of office within the
time provided under § 6-13-617(a)(1), the position is vacant and the school
district board of directors shall fill the vacancy shall be filled as
provided under § 6-13-611.
(d)(1) An entire school district board of directors is required to be
elected during the first school board election after a school district:
(A) Changes from an all at-large or combined at-large and
zoned membership and is zoned to an all zoned or combined at-large and zoned
membership;
(B) Is rezoned following the federal decennial census;
(C) Returns from state to local control;
(D) Has boundary or zone changes as a result of
annexation, consolidation, or reconstruction;
(E) Has fallen below the average daily membership
requirement under § 6-13-634(a); or
(F) Is no longer operating under a court ordered exemption
to § 6-13-634(b).
(2) School board members shall initially draw lots for two-year
or four-year terms in districts with four-year terms or two-year, four-year,
or six-year terms in districts with six-year terms so that, as nearly as
possible, an equal number of positions are filled in each subsequent school
board election no longer than:
(A) Two (2) school board elections for those with four-
year terms; or
(B) Three (3) school board elections for those with six-
year terms.
(3) Initially, terms for members elected in 2025 shall expire:
(A) For school boards adopting four-year terms in 2028; or
(B) For school boards adopting six-year terms in 2030.
(4) For other members of a school district board of directors
currently holding terms, terms set to expire on or in:
(A) 2026 shall expire in 2026;
(B) 2027 shall expire in 2026;
(C) 2028 shall expire in 2028; and
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
(D) 2029 shall expire in 2028.
(5) If after rebalancing terms, there is not, as nearly as
possible, an equal number of positions filled every school board election,
the school district board of directors shall adjust the minimum number of
terms necessary to ensure balance between those terms expiring in 2026 and
2028.
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-13-611(e), concerning vacancies generally
of a school district board of directors, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) An appointed director, except a director appointed to fill a
vacancy under § 6-13-613, shall serve only until his or her elected successor
subscribes to the director's oath of office under § 6-13-617 to the next
annual school election, at which time the electors shall select in the usual
manner directors to serve the unexpired terms of the vacating directors.
(2) If there is not an individual who has filed as a candidate
to serve an unexpired term of a vacating director, the position shall be:
(A) Deemed vacant; and
(B) Filled in accordance with this section.
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-13-634(d), concerning the size of a
school district board of directors, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Any change in the number of directors serving on a school district
board of directors under this section is effective upon the directors' taking
office following the next regular annual school board election.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1415(e)(1)(B), concerning an interim
school district board of directors following an involuntary consolidation or
annexation, is amended to read as follows:
(B) All the members of the permanent board of directors of
the resulting district or receiving district are elected at-large, then the
state board may stagger the terms of the interim board of directors, which
shall be determined by lot so that no more than two (2) members' terms expire
during any one (1) year , as nearly as possible, an equal number of positions
are filled during each school board election.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102(a)(1)(B), concerning the annual
school election date, is repealed.
(B)(i) A school district shall adopt a policy setting
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
forth which election date under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section the
school district chooses to hold the annual school election upon.
(ii) At least one hundred (100) days before the
first day of the respective candidate filing period set forth in § 6-14-
111(e)(1)(A), a school district shall provide a copy of the policy under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section to:
(a) The county board of election commissioners
of the county in which the school district is domiciled for administrative
purposes; and
(b) The county clerk of each county within the
school district's boundaries.
(iii) If a school district fails to timely provide a
copy of its most current policy to the county board of election commissioners
and county clerks in accordance with subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) of this
section, the school district shall be required to hold the school district's
annual school election in accordance with the most recent policy the school
district has provided to the county board of election commissioners and
county clerks.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1417(a)(3), concerning the formation
of a school district board of directors following an involuntary
consolidation or annexation, is amended to read as follows:
(3) At the first meeting of the permanent board of directors,
the members shall determine the terms of the board of directors by lot so
that not more than two (2) members' terms expire during any one (1) year , as
nearly as possible, an equal number of positions are filled during each
school board election.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102(c)(1), concerning the annual
school election date and special school elections, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) When the annual school election is not held at the same time as
a preferential primary or general election, if no more than one (1) candidate
for a school district director position presents a petition or notice as
required by § 6-14-111 and if there are no other ballot issues to be
submitted to school district electors for consideration, with the exception
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
of the local tax rate if that rate is not being changed or restructured, the
board of directors of a school district, by resolution, may request the
county board of election commissioners to:
(A) Reduce the number of polling places;
(B) Open no polling places on election day so that the
election can be conducted by absentee ballot and early voting only; or
(C)(i) Declare an election by candidate to be held;
(ii) Open no polling places; and
(iii) Allow the candidate to cast a ballot for
himself or herself at a designated time and location on election day or
during the period that would otherwise be designated for early voting.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-14-121(a)(1), concerning runoff
elections, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Whenever there are more than two (2) candidates for election
to any position on a board of directors at any election held in this state
and whenever no candidate for any school district position receives a
majority of the votes cast for the office or whenever there is a tie vote,
there shall be a runoff election held in the school district.
(B) In the event of a runoff election, the current member
of the position for which there is a runoff election shall serve as a
holdover until the person elected in the runoff election receives
certification of the administration of the oath under § 6-13-617.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102(a)(1)(A), concerning the annual
school election date and special school elections, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) The annual school election shall be held in each school
district of the state:
(i) In even-numbered years, on the date of the:
(a) Preferential preferential primary election; or
(b) General election; and
(ii) In odd-numbered years, on the:
(a) Second Tuesday in November; or
(b) Second first Tuesday in May after the first
Monday in March.
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102, concerning the annual school
election date and special school elections, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d) The election of a school district board of directors not elected
entirely during the same election shall be held in each public school
district of this state on the date of the preferential primary election.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(a), concerning the candidate
filing procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) All candidate filings under this subchapter shall be with the
county clerk of the county in which the school district is domiciled for
administrative purposes.
(2) A district school board member shall be elected at the
preferential primary election.
(2)(A)(i) (3)(A)(i) In a special school election or an annual
school election not held with the preferential primary or general election,
all actions required of county boards of election commissioners shall be
performed by the county board of election commissioners of the county in
which the school district is domiciled for administrative purposes.
(ii) However, if one of that school district's
nondomicile counties is holding a special election on the same date as a
school election and at least one (1) qualified elector in the county is
eligible to vote in both the special election and the school election, each
county in which the school district has territory shall conduct the school
district's school election as if it were held with the preferential primary
or general election.
(B) When a county clerk of a school district's nondomicile
county becomes aware that a special election will be held on the same date as
a school district's annual or special school election and at least one (1)
qualified elector in the county is eligible to vote in both the special
election and the school election, the county clerk of the nondomicile county
shall immediately notify the county clerk of the county in which the school
district is domiciled for administrative purposes in writing that the school
district's school election shall be conducted under subdivision (a)(3)(a)(4)
of this section.
(C) The county clerk of the county in which the school
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
district is domiciled for administrative purposes shall then immediately
notify the county clerks of any other nondomicile counties that the school
district's election will be conducted under subdivision (a)(3)(a)(4) of this
section.
(3)(4) In a school election held with the preferential primary
or general election, all actions required of county boards of election
commissioners shall be performed by the county board of election
commissioners of the county in which the electors reside.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(e)(1), concerning the candidate
filing procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) The petition, affidavit of eligibility, and the candidate's
political practices pledge shall be filed with the county clerk as follows:
(A)(i) For even-numbered years, during the party filing
period as set forth in § 7-7-203 for school elections held concurrently with
a preferential primary election; and
(ii) For odd-numbered years, during the dates that
would be the filing period as set forth in § 7-7-203 if a preferential
primary and general election were to be held in that year; or
(B) During a one-week period ending at 12:00 noon ninety
(90) days before a school election held in November beginning at 12:00 noon
on the first day of the party filing period under § 7-7-203 and shall end at
12:00 noon on the last day of the party filing period under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(h)(2), concerning candidate
filing procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The county board of election commissioners shall not place
the name of an unopposed candidate for school district director on the ballot
during a school board election held concurrently with the preferential
primary election or general election.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(k), concerning candidate filing
procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(k) The order in which the names of the respective candidates are to
appear on the ballot shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of the
county board of election commissioners held not later than:
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
(1) The the deadline to conduct the ballot draw for the
preferential primary or general election for an annual school election held
in even-numbered years;
(2) The seventh day of March for an annual school election held
on the second Tuesday in May of an odd-numbered year; and
(3) Seventy-two (72) days before an annual school election held
on the second Tuesday of November of an odd-numbered year.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 6-14-121(a)(3), concerning runoff
elections, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The runoff election shall be held:
(A) Four (4) weeks following the date of an election held
in any odd-numbered year;
(B) On the date designated for the general primary
election if the annual school election is held with the preferential primary
election; or
(C) On the date designated for the general runoff election
if the annual school election is held with the general election at the same
time as the general election.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-14-121(c), concerning runoff elections,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) If one (1) of the two (2) candidates who received the highest
number of votes for a position withdraws before certification of the result
of the school board election, the remaining candidate who received the most
votes at the school board election shall be declared elected to the office
and there shall be no school board election runoff.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 7-10-102 is amended to read as follows:
7-10-102. Nonpartisan election of judges, justices, and prosecuting
attorneys, and school board members.
(a) The offices of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of
Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, and prosecuting attorney, and a
member of a school district board of directors are nonpartisan offices.
(b)(1) The general elections for nonpartisan offices shall be held on
the same date and at the same times and places as provided by law for
04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/1/25 HB1724
preferential primary elections.
(2)(A) The names of nonpartisan candidates shall be:
(i) Included on the ballots of the political
parties; and
(ii) Designated as nonpartisan candidates.
(B) Separate ballots containing the names of nonpartisan
candidates shall be:
(i) Prepared; and
(ii) Made available to voters requesting a separate
ballot.
(3) A voter shall not be required to vote in a political party's
preferential primary to be able to vote in a nonpartisan election.
(c)(1) A person shall not be elected to the office of Justice of the
Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge,
or prosecuting attorney, or a member of a school district board of directors
unless the person receives a majority of the votes cast at the election for
the office.
(2) In a nonpartisan election in which no person receives a
majority of the votes cast, the two (2) candidates receiving the highest and
next highest number of votes shall be certified to a runoff election, which
shall be held on the same date and at the same times and places as the
November general election.
(3) The names of the candidates in a nonpartisan runoff election
shall be placed on the same ballots as used for the November general
elections.

/s/B. McKenzie









04-01-2025 12:45:20 SSS099